Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1809
Property, defined.

Property means the real estate upon which a project is or will be located, including equipment, machinery, and other similar items necessary or convenient for the operation of the project in the manner for which its use is intended, but not including such items as fuel, supplies, or other items that are customarily deemed to result in a current operation charge. Property does not include any property used or to be used primarily for sectarian instruction or study or as a place for devotional activities or religious worship.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 9.